Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB240.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1897YC (1) 91 ss/ko H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 124E.4, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 1 2025, is amended by striking the paragraph. 2 Sec. 2. Section 124E.4, subsection 1, paragraph d, 3 subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 4 (1) The patientâs full name, Iowa residence address, date 5 of birth, and telephone number. 6 Sec. 3. Section 124E.4, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 7 2025, is amended to read as follows: 8 a. The patientâs full name, Iowa residence address, and date 9 of birth. 10